North Carolina, session 2025, SB654.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Dual Licensure for Audiologists, Audiology Technicians, and
Audiology Assistants Ended. – G.S. 93D-14 reads as rewritten:
"§ 93D-14. Persons not affected.
(a) Nothing in this Chapter shall apply to a physician licensed to practice medicine or
surgery in the State of North Carolina.
(b) Any person who meets the requirements of having both a doctoral degree in
Audiology and holding a valid permanent unrestricted license as an audiologist audiologist,
audiology assistant, or certified technician under Article 22 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes
of North Carolina is exempt from licensure under this Chapter. A person who does not meet both
requirements of having a doctoral degree in Audiology and holding a valid permanent license as
an audiologist under Article 22 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes of North Carolina must
become a registered apprentice or be licensed by the Board before fitting or selling hearing aids
in the State of North Carolina.
(c) Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to exempt an audiology assistant or
certified technician, working under the supervision of a licensee or a person exempt from
licensure under this Chapter, from being subject to the provisions of this Chapter. Such a person,
before engaging in fitting or selling hearing aids, as defined in this Chapter, must be registered
as an apprentice under a Registered Sponsor or be licensed by the Board.
(d) The provisions of this Chapter shall not apply to the activities and services of an
audiology student pursuing a course of study in an accredited college or university, if these
activities and services constitute a part of such person's course of study."
SECTION 1.(b) Effective date. – This section is effective when it becomes law.
*S654-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.(a) Locked Hearing Aid Disclosures for Hearing Aid Fitters and
Dealers. – Chapter 93D of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 93D-7.1. Disclosure of locked hearing aid software; additional disclosures and record
keeping.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Locked hearing aid. – A hearing aid that uses either proprietary programming
software or locked, nonproprietary programming software that restricts
programming or servicing of the device to specific facilities or providers
(2) Locked, nonproprietary programming software. – Software that any provider
or seller can render inaccessible to other hearing aid programmers.
(3) Proprietary programming software. – Software used to program hearing aids
that is supplied by a hearing aid distributor or manufacturer for exclusive use
by affiliated providers or sellers. This software is locked and inaccessible to
nonaffiliated providers or sellers.
(b) Disclosure of Locked Programming Software. – To the extent not inconsistent with
federal law, any person licensed under this Chapter who sells locked hearing aids shall, before
consummating the sale of any locked hearing aid, provide the purchaser with a written notice, in
12-point type or larger, stating:
"The hearing aid being purchased uses proprietary or locked programming software and can
only be serviced or programmed at specific facilities or locations."
The purchaser shall sign the notice prior to sale completion. The seller shall retain a copy of
the signed notice for at least seven years, subject to the conditions of subsection (d) of this section.
(c) Written Receipt of Sale. – Upon consummation of a sale of a locked hearing aid, in
addition to complying with G.S. 93D-7, the licensee shall deliver to the purchaser a written
receipt signed by or on behalf of the licensee, containing all of the following information:
(1) The date of consummation of the sale.
(2) The make, model number, and serial number of the hearing aid sold.
(3) Whether the hearing aid is new, used, or reconditioned.
(4) The licensee's name and license number, and the name and license number of
any other hearing aid dispenser, apprentice, temporary licensee, or trainee
licensee who provided any recommendation or consultation regarding the
purchase.
(5) The address of the principal place of business of the licensee, and the address
and office hours at which the licensee shall be available for fitting or
post-fitting adjustments and servicing of the hearing aid sold.
(6) The terms of any guarantee or written warranty made to the purchaser with
respect to the hearing aid.
If multiple locked hearing aids are sold in a single transaction, a single written notice under
subsection (b) and a single written receipt under subsection (c) may be used to satisfy the
requirements of this section, provided that the required information for each hearing aid sold is
clearly documented.
(d) Record Keeping. – The licensee shall maintain, for a period of at least seven years
after the sale, the following records for each hearing aid sold:
(1) A copy of the written notice described in subsection (b) of this section as
signed by the purchaser.
(2) A copy of the written receipt described in subsection (c) of this section.
(3) The results of any audiologic tests or measurements performed as part of the
fitting and dispensing of the hearing aid or aids.
(4) A copy of any written recommendations prepared as part of the fitting and
dispensing of the hearing aid or aids.
Page 2 Senate Bill 654-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
These records shall be kept at the licensee's principal place of practice and shall be made
available for inspection by the Board."
SECTION 2.(b) Rulemaking. – The North Carolina State Hearing Aid Dealers and
Fitters Board may adopt rules to implement subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 3.(a) Locked Hearing Aid Disclosures for Audiologists. – Article 22 of
Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 90-308. Disclosure of locked hearing aid software by audiologists; receipt and record
requirements.
(a) Disclosure of Locked Programming Software. – To the extent not inconsistent with
federal law, a licensed audiologist who engages in the fitting or selling of locked hearing aids, as
defined in G.S. 93D-7.1(a)(1), shall, before consummating the sale of any locked hearing aid,
provide the purchasing patient with a written notice in at least 12-point type stating:
"The hearing aid being purchased uses proprietary or locked programming software and can
only be serviced or programmed at specific facilities or locations."
This notice must be signed by the purchasing patient prior to sale completion. The audiologist
shall retain a copy of the signed notice in the patient's file in addition to the record requirements
of subsection (c) of this section.
(b) Receipt of Sale. – Upon the consummation of a sale of a locked hearing aid, in
addition to complying with G.S. 93D-7, the audiologist shall give the purchasing patient a written
receipt, signed by or on behalf of the audiologist, containing all of the following information:
(1) The date of consummation of the sale.
(2) The make, model, and serial number of the hearing aid sold.
(3) Whether the hearing aid is new, used, or reconditioned.
(4) The audiologist's name and license number. If any other hearing care
professionals licensed under this Article, such as another audiologist or
temporary licensee, provided any recommendation or consultation for the
purchase, their name and applicable license number shall also be noted.
(5) The address of the principal place of business of the audiologist, and the
address and office hours at which the audiologist shall be available for fitting
or post-fitting adjustments and servicing of the hearing aid sold.
(6) The terms of any guarantee or written warranty made to the purchasing patient
with respect to the hearing aid.
If multiple locked hearing aids are sold in a single transaction, a single written notice under
subsection (a) and a single written receipt under subsection (b) may be used to satisfy the
requirements of this section, provided that the required information for each hearing aid sold is
clearly documented.
(c) Record Keeping. – A licensed audiologist shall maintain, for a period of at least seven
years after the sale, the following records for each locked hearing aid transaction:
(1) A copy of the written notice described in subsection (a) of this section as
signed by the purchasing patient.
(2) A copy of the written receipt described in subsection (b) of this section.
(3) The results of any audiologic tests or measurements performed as part of the
fitting and dispensing of the locked hearing aid or aids.
(4) A copy of any written recommendations prepared as part of the fitting and
dispensing of the hearing aid or aids.
These records shall be kept at the audiologist's principal place of practice and shall be made
available for inspection by the Board."
SECTION 3.(b) Rulemaking. – The North Carolina Board of Examiners for Speech
and Language Pathologists and Audiologists may adopt rules to implement subsection (a) of this
section.
Senate Bill 654-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 4. Effective Date. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes
effective October 1, 2025.
Page 4 Senate Bill 654-First Edition